lt-LT_morphology.aff
FLAG num
SFX 6780 Y 2
SFX 6780 emti emti/471 . 336
SFX 6780 emtis emtis/471 . 336

SFX 6781 Y 2
SFX 6781 emti emti/472 . 336
SFX 6781 emtis emtis/472 . 336

SFX 6782 Y 2
SFX 6782 emti emti/473 . 336
SFX 6782 emtis emtis/473 . 336

SFX 6793 Y 2
SFX 6793 emti emia/474 . 337
SFX 6793 emtis emiasi/474 . 337

SFX 6794 Y 2
SFX 6794 emti emia/475 . 337
SFX 6794 emtis emiasi/475 . 337

SFX 6795 Y 2
SFX 6795 emti emia/476 . 337
SFX 6795 emtis emiasi/476 . 337

SFX 6796 Y 2
SFX 6796 emti emia/477 . 337
SFX 6796 emtis emiasi/477 . 337

SFX 6797 Y 2
SFX 6797 emti emia/478 . 337
SFX 6797 emtis emiasi/478 . 337

SFX 6798 Y 2
SFX 6798 emti emia/479 . 337
SFX 6798 emtis emiasi/479 . 337

SFX 6799 Y 2
SFX 6799 emti emia/480 . 337
SFX 6799 emtis emiasi/480 . 337

SFX 6800 Y 2
SFX 6800 emti emia/481 . 337
SFX 6800 emtis emiasi/481 . 337

SFX 6801 Y 2
SFX 6801 emti emia/482 . 337
SFX 6801 emtis emiasi/482 . 337

SFX 6811 Y 1
SFX 6811 emti emie/483 . 337

SFX 6812 Y 1
SFX 6812 emtis emie/484 . 337

SFX 6813 Y 2
SFX 6813 emti ėmė/485 . 338
SFX 6813 emtis ėmėsi/485 . 338

SFX 6814 Y 2
SFX 6814 emti ėmė/486 . 338
SFX 6814 emtis ėmėsi/486 . 338

SFX 6815 Y 2
SFX 6815 emti ėmė/487 . 338
SFX 6815 emtis ėmėsi/487 . 338

SFX 6819 Y 2
SFX 6819 ūti ūti/464 . 336
SFX 6819 ūtis ūtis/464 . 336

SFX 6820 Y 2
SFX 6820 ūti ūti/494 . 336
SFX 6820 ūtis ūtis/494 . 336

SFX 6821 Y 2
SFX 6821 ūti ūti/466 . 336
SFX 6821 ūtis ūtis/466 . 336

SFX 6822 Y 2
SFX 6822 ūti ūti/467 . 336
SFX 6822 ūtis ūtis/467 . 336

SFX 6823 Y 2
SFX 6823 ūti ūti/468 . 336
SFX 6823 ūtis ūtis/468 . 336

SFX 6824 Y 2
SFX 6824 ūti ūti/469 . 336
SFX 6824 ūtis ūtis/469 . 336

SFX 6825 Y 2
SFX 6825 ūti ūti/470 . 336
SFX 6825 ūtis ūtis/470 . 336

SFX 6826 Y 2
SFX 6826 ūti ūti/471 . 336
SFX 6826 ūtis ūtis/471 . 336

SFX 6827 Y 2
SFX 6827 ūti ūti/472 . 336
SFX 6827 ūtis ūtis/472 . 336

SFX 6828 Y 2
SFX 6828 ūti ūti/473 . 336
SFX 6828 ūtis ūtis/473 . 336

SFX 6839 Y 2
SFX 6839 ūti ūva/474 . 337
SFX 6839 ūtis ūvasi/474 . 337

SFX 6840 Y 2
SFX 6840 ūti ūva/475 . 337
SFX 6840 ūtis ūvasi/475 . 337

SFX 6841 Y 2
SFX 6841 ūti ūva/476 . 337
SFX 6841 ūtis ūvasi/476 . 337

SFX 6842 Y 2
SFX 6842 ūti ūva/477 . 337
SFX 6842 ūtis ūvasi/477 . 337

SFX 6843 Y 2
SFX 6843 ūti ūva/478 . 337
SFX 6843 ūtis ūvasi/478 . 337

SFX 6844 Y 2
SFX 6844 ūti ūva/479 . 337
SFX 6844 ūtis ūvasi/479 . 337

SFX 6845 Y 2
SFX 6845 ūti ūva/480 . 337
SFX 6845 ūtis ūvasi/480 . 337

SFX 6846 Y 2
SFX 6846 ūti ūva/481 . 337
SFX 6846 ūtis ūvasi/481 . 337

SFX 6847 Y 2
SFX 6847 ūti ūva/482 . 337
SFX 6847 ūtis ūvasi/482 . 337

SFX 6857 Y 1
SFX 6857 ūti ūvie/483 . 337

SFX 6858 Y 1
SFX 6858 ūtis ūvie/484 . 337

SFX 6859 Y 2
SFX 6859 ūti uvo/485 . 338
SFX 6859 ūtis uvosi/485 . 338

SFX 6860 Y 2
SFX 6860 ūti uvo/486 . 338
SFX 6860 ūtis uvosi/486 . 338

SFX 6861 Y 2
SFX 6861 ūti uvo/487 . 338
SFX 6861 ūtis uvosi/487 . 338

SFX 6865 Y 2
SFX 6865 sti sti/464 . 336
SFX 6865 stis stis/464 . 336

SFX 6866 Y 2
SFX 6866 sti sti/465 . 336
SFX 6866 stis stis/465 . 336

SFX 6867 Y 2
SFX 6867 sti sti/466 . 336
SFX 6867 stis stis/466 . 336

SFX 6868 Y 2
SFX 6868 sti sti/467 . 336
SFX 6868 stis stis/467 . 336

SFX 6869 Y 2
SFX 6869 sti sti/468 . 336
SFX 6869 stis stis/468 . 336

SFX 6870 Y 2
SFX 6870 sti sti/469 . 336
SFX 6870 stis stis/469 . 336

SFX 6871 Y 2
SFX 6871 sti sti/470 . 336
SFX 6871 stis stis/470 . 336

SFX 6872 Y 2
SFX 6872 sti sti/471 . 336
SFX 6872 stis stis/471 . 336

SFX 6873 Y 2
SFX 6873 sti sti/472 . 336
SFX 6873 stis stis/472 . 336

SFX 6874 Y 2
SFX 6874 sti sti/473 . 336
SFX 6874 stis stis/473 . 336

SFX 6885 Y 2
SFX 6885 sti da/474 . 337
SFX 6885 stis dasi/474 . 337

SFX 6886 Y 2
SFX 6886 sti da/475 . 337
SFX 6886 stis dasi/475 . 337

SFX 6887 Y 2
SFX 6887 sti da/476 . 337
SFX 6887 stis dasi/476 . 337

SFX 6888 Y 2
SFX 6888 sti da/477 . 337
SFX 6888 stis dasi/477 . 337

SFX 6889 Y 2
SFX 6889 sti da/478 . 337
SFX 6889 stis dasi/478 . 337

SFX 6890 Y 2
SFX 6890 sti da/479 . 337
SFX 6890 stis dasi/479 . 337

SFX 6891 Y 2
SFX 6891 sti da/480 . 337
SFX 6891 stis dasi/480 . 337

SFX 6892 Y 2
SFX 6892 sti da/481 . 337
SFX 6892 stis dasi/481 . 337

SFX 6893 Y 2
SFX 6893 sti da/482 . 337
SFX 6893 stis dasi/482 . 337

SFX 6903 Y 1
SFX 6903 sti die/483 . 337

SFX 6904 Y 1
SFX 6904 stis die/484 . 337

SFX 6905 Y 2
SFX 6905 sti do/485 . 338
SFX 6905 stis dosi/485 . 338

SFX 6906 Y 2
SFX 6906 sti do/486 . 338
SFX 6906 stis dosi/486 . 338

SFX 6907 Y 2
SFX 6907 sti do/487 . 338
SFX 6907 stis dosi/487 . 338

SFX 6911 Y 2
SFX 6911 alti alti/464 . 336
SFX 6911 altis altis/464 . 336

SFX 6912 Y 2
SFX 6912 alti alti/465 . 336
SFX 6912 altis altis/465 . 336

SFX 6913 Y 2
SFX 6913 alti alti/466 . 336
SFX 6913 altis altis/466 . 336

SFX 6914 Y 2
SFX 6914 alti alti/467 . 336
SFX 6914 altis altis/467 . 336

SFX 6915 Y 2
SFX 6915 alti alti/468 . 336
SFX 6915 altis altis/468 . 336

SFX 6916 Y 2
SFX 6916 alti alti/469 . 336
SFX 6916 altis altis/469 . 336

SFX 6917 Y 2
SFX 6917 alti alti/470 . 336
SFX 6917 altis altis/470 . 336

SFX 6918 Y 2
SFX 6918 alti alti/471 . 336
SFX 6918 altis altis/471 . 336

SFX 6919 Y 2
SFX 6919 alti alti/472 . 336
SFX 6919 altis altis/472 . 336

SFX 6920 Y 2
SFX 6920 alti alti/473 . 336
SFX 6920 altis altis/473 . 336

SFX 6931 Y 2
SFX 6931 alti ąla/474 . 337
SFX 6931 altis ąlasi/474 . 337

SFX 6932 Y 2
SFX 6932 alti ąla/475 . 337
SFX 6932 altis ąlasi/475 . 337

SFX 6933 Y 2
SFX 6933 alti ąla/476 . 337
SFX 6933 altis ąlasi/476 . 337

SFX 6934 Y 2
SFX 6934 alti ąla/477 . 337
SFX 6934 altis ąlasi/477 . 337

SFX 6935 Y 2
SFX 6935 alti ąla/478 . 337
SFX 6935 altis ąlasi/478 . 337

SFX 6936 Y 2
SFX 6936 alti ąla/479 . 337
SFX 6936 altis ąlasi/479 . 337

SFX 6937 Y 2
SFX 6937 alti ąla/480 . 337
SFX 6937 altis ąlasi/480 . 337

SFX 6938 Y 2
SFX 6938 alti ąla/481 . 337
SFX 6938 altis ąlasi/481 . 337

SFX 6939 Y 2
SFX 6939 alti ąla/482 . 337
SFX 6939 altis ąlasi/482 . 337

SFX 6949 Y 1
SFX 6949 alti ąlie/483 . 337

SFX 6950 Y 1
SFX 6950 altis ąlie/484 . 337

SFX 6951 Y 2
SFX 6951 alti alo/485 . 338
SFX 6951 altis alosi/485 . 338

SFX 6952 Y 2
SFX 6952 alti alo/486 . 338
SFX 6952 altis alosi/486 . 338

SFX 6953 Y 2
SFX 6953 alti alo/487 . 338
SFX 6953 altis alosi/487 . 338

SFX 6957 Y 2
SFX 6957 irti irti/464 . 336
SFX 6957 irtis irtis/464 . 336

SFX 6958 Y 2
SFX 6958 irti irti/465 . 336
SFX 6958 irtis irtis/465 . 336

SFX 6959 Y 2
SFX 6959 irti irti/466 . 336
SFX 6959 irtis irtis/466 . 336

SFX 6960 Y 2
SFX 6960 irti irti/467 . 336
SFX 6960 irtis irtis/467 . 336

SFX 6961 Y 2
SFX 6961 irti irti/468 . 336
SFX 6961 irtis irtis/468 . 336

SFX 6962 Y 2
SFX 6962 irti irti/469 . 336
SFX 6962 irtis irtis/469 . 336

SFX 6963 Y 2
SFX 6963 irti irti/470 . 336
SFX 6963 irtis irtis/470 . 336

SFX 6964 Y 2
SFX 6964 irti irti/471 . 336
SFX 6964 irtis irtis/471 . 336

SFX 6965 Y 2
SFX 6965 irti irti/472 . 336
SFX 6965 irtis irtis/472 . 336

SFX 6966 Y 2
SFX 6966 irti irti/473 . 336
SFX 6966 irtis irtis/473 . 336

SFX 6977 Y 2
SFX 6977 irti yra/474 . 337
SFX 6977 irtis yrasi/474 . 337

SFX 6978 Y 2
SFX 6978 irti yra/475 . 337
SFX 6978 irtis yrasi/475 . 337

SFX 6979 Y 2
SFX 6979 irti yra/476 . 337
SFX 6979 irtis yrasi/476 . 337

SFX 6980 Y 2
SFX 6980 irti yra/477 . 337
SFX 6980 irtis yrasi/477 . 337

SFX 6981 Y 2
SFX 6981 irti yra/478 . 337
SFX 6981 irtis yrasi/478 . 337

SFX 6982 Y 2
SFX 6982 irti yra/479 . 337
SFX 6982 irtis yrasi/479 . 337

SFX 6983 Y 2
SFX 6983 irti yra/480 . 337
SFX 6983 irtis yrasi/480 . 337

SFX 6984 Y 2
SFX 6984 irti yra/481 . 337
SFX 6984 irtis yrasi/481 . 337

SFX 6985 Y 2
SFX 6985 irti yra/482 . 337
SFX 6985 irtis yrasi/482 . 337

SFX 6995 Y 1
SFX 6995 irti yrie/483 . 337

SFX 6996 Y 1
SFX 6996 irtis yrie/484 . 337

SFX 6997 Y 2
SFX 6997 irti iro/485 . 338
SFX 6997 irtis irosi/485 . 338

SFX 6998 Y 2
SFX 6998 irti iro/486 . 338
SFX 6998 irtis irosi/486 . 338

SFX 6999 Y 2
SFX 6999 irti iro/487 . 338
SFX 6999 irtis irosi/487 . 338

SFX 7003 Y 2
SFX 7003 isti isti/464 . 336
SFX 7003 istis istis/464 . 336

AF 6957,6958,6977,6997,65521 # 146
AF 6911,6912,6931,6951,65521 # 170
AF 6773,6774,6793,6813,65521 # 172
AF 6865,6866,6885,6905,65521 # 174
AF 7003,7004,7023,7043,65521 # 195
AF 6819,6820,6839,6859,65521 # 388
