lt-LT_morphology.dic
apžabalti/170	11
atsemti/172	11
atsigrūsti/174	13
atskristi/195	11
balti/170	11
besigrūsti/174	13
besiremti/172	13
birti/146	11
bristi/195	11
grūstis/174	13
įbirti/146	11
įsėsti/174	11
įsibristi/195	13
įsisėsti/174	13
išbalti/170	11
išbirti/146	11
išbristi/195	11
išsemti/172	11
išsigrūsti/174	13
išvemti/172	11
neapsalti/170	33
neapskristi/195	33
neapvemti/172	33
neatsisėsti/174	34
neatšalti/170	33
nebeapsemti/172	33
nebeatbristi/195	33
nebeatšalti/170	33
nebebristi/195	33
nebegrūsti/174	33
nebeįskristi/195	33
nebeįšalti/170	33
nebeišnirti/146	33
nebeišskristi/195	33
nebeparemti/172	33
nebeparskristi/195	33
nebepasvirti/146	33
nebeperšalti/170	33
nebepribristi/195	33
nebeprisėsti/174	33
nebesigrūsti/174	34
nebesiremti/172	34
nebesušalti/170	33
nebeužsigrūsti/174	34
nebeužšalti/170	33
nebirti/146	33
nebristi/195	33
neįremti/172	33
neįsigrūsti/174	34
neišbalti/170	33
neišbristi/195	33
neišnirti/146	33
neišsivemti/172	34
nenulemti/172	33
nenusvirti/146	33
nenušalti/170	33
nenuščiūti/388	33
nepanirti/146	33
neparskristi/195	33
nepasemti/172	33
nepasrūti/388	33
nepašalti/170	33
nepažirti/146	33
nepergrūsti/174	33
nepraskristi/195	33
nepriremti/172	33
neprisėsti/174	33
neprišalti/170	33
neremti/172	33
nesrūti/388	33
nesubirti/146	33
nesugrūsti/174	33
nesuremti/172	33
nesusivemti/172	34
nesuskristi/195	33
nesvirti/146	33
nešalti/170	33
neužsėsti/174	33
nevemti/172	33
nubalti/170	11
nubirti/146	11
nunirti/146	11
nusigrūsti/174	13
nuskristi/195	11
nusrūti/388	11
nuščiūti/388	11
nutremti/172	11
nužirti/146	11
pabalti/170	11
panirti/146	11
paskristi/195	11
pasrūti/388	11
pasvirti/146	11
perbalti/170	11
persėsti/174	11
persvirti/146	11
pribirti/146	11
pribristi/195	11
prisėsti/174	11
prisisemti/172	13
prišalti/170	11
srūti/388	11
subirti/146	11
subliūti/388	11
sugrūsti/174	11
susiremti/172	13
sušalti/170	11
svirti/146	11
teatskristi/195	11
tebesėsti/174	11
tebesrūti/388	11
tebevemti/172	11
teįšalti/170	11
tenubristi/195	11
tesrūti/388	11
tremti/172	11
užsigrūsti/174	13
užskristi/195	11
žalti/170	11
žirti/146	11
